Hawaii statutes.
§514A-82.4
Duty of directors. Each
director shall owe the association of apartment owners a fiduciary duty in the
performance of the director's responsibilities. [L 2007, c 244, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next